en: Dried porcini mushrooms, Dried porcini, Dried penny bun, Dried porcino
de: Getrocknete Steinpilze
es: Boletos comestibles deshidratados, Boletus edulis deshidratados, Setas de calabaza deshidratadas, Boletus comestible deshidratados
fr: Cèpes déshydratés, Cèpes secs, Cèpes séchés, Cèpes de Bordeaux secs
hr: Sušeni vrganji
it: Funghi porcini secchi
nl: Gedroogd gewoon eekhoorntjesbrood

en: Dried scotch bonnet mushrooms, Dried scotch bonnets, Dried fairy ring mushrooms
es: Setas senderilla deshidratadas
fr: Marasmes des Oréades secs, Faux mousserons secs, Cariolettes secs
hr: Sušene gljive scotch bonnet
nl: Gedroogde weidekringzwammen

en: Dried shiitake mushrooms, Dried shiitake, Dried Lentinula edodes
de: Getrocknete Shiitake Pilze
es: Setas shiitake deshidratadas, Shiitake deshidratadas, Shiitakes deshidratadas, Setas shitake deshidratadas, Lentinula edodes deshidratadas
fr: Champignons shiitake séchés, Shiitake séchés, Shiitakes séchés, Lentins du chêne séchés, Lentinula edodes séchés, Lentins comestibles séchés
hr: Sušene shiitake gljive
nl: Gedroogde shiitakes
pl: Suszone grzyby shiitake

en: Mushroom powders, Mushroom flours
ar: مساحيق الفطر، طحين الفطر
az: Şəftali tozları, Şəftali unları
be: грыбныя пудры, грыбныя мука
bg: гъбени прахове, гъбена брашна
bn: মাশরুম পাউডার, মাশরুম ফ্লোর
br: puñsioù mouk, puñsioù mouk ar c'hoarzh
bs: gljivice u prahu, gljivice brašna
ca: Polvos de bolets, Farines de bolets
co: pudri di funghi, farine di funghi
cs: Houbové prášky, Houbové mouky
cy: Pwdr mwgyn, Blawd mwgyn
da: Svampemel, Svampepulver
de: Pilzpulver, Pilzmehl
el: Σκόνη μανιταριών, Αλεύρι μανιταριών
eo: Gribo-pulvoroj, Gribo-farunoj
es: Harinas de setas, Setas en polvo, Setas deshidratadas en polvo
et: Seenejahu
eu: Harinak
fi: Sienijauheet, Sienijauhot
fr: Poudres de champignons
hr: Prah gljiva
nl: Paddestoelenpoeders

en: Pastas and dumplings
fr: Pâtes et bouchées farcies

en: Pastas
xx: Pasta
ar: معكرونة
az: makaron
be: макаронныя вырабы
bg: паста
bn: পাস্তা
br: toazennoù
co: pastasciutta
cs: těstoviny
de: Teigwaren
el: Ζυμαρικό
eo: pastaĵo
es: Pastas alimenticias, pastas
fr: pâtes alimentaires, pâtes
gd: pastà
gu: પાસ્તા
he: פסטה
hi: पास्ता
hr: tjestenine, tjestenina
hu: olasz tészta
hy: մակարոնեղեն
it: pasta, paste alimentari
ja: パスタ
ka: მაკარონი
kn: ಪಾಸ್ತಾ
ko: 파스타
ku: meqarne
lt: makaronai
mr: पास्ता
my: ပါစတာ
ne: पास्ता
nl: Pasta, Deegwaren, pastas
or: ପାସ୍ତା
pa: ਪਾਸਤਾ
pl: Makarony, Makaron
pt: massa alimentícia
ro: paste făinoase
ru: Макаронные изделия
sk: cestovina
sl: testenine
so: baasto
ta: பாஸ்தா
te: పాస్తా
th: พาสตา
tr: makarna
uk: макаронні вироби
ur: پاستا
uz: makaron mahsulotlari
vi: nui
wa: påsses itålyinnes
wo: makaróni
zh: 意式面食

en: Cereal pastas
fr: Pâtes alimentaires de céréales
hr: Tjestenine od žitarica
it: Paste alimentari di cereali
nl: Graanpastas
sv: Spannmålspasta, Pasta av spannmål
zh: 谷物意大利面

en: Conchiglie
xx: Conchiglie

en: Penne
xx: Penne
bg: Пене
ja: ペンネ

en: Penne rigate
xx: Penne rigate
bg: Пене Ригате

en: Penne lisce
xx: Penne lisce
it: Penne lisce

en: Orecchiette
xx: Orecchiette

en: Rigatoni
xx: Rigatoni
bg: Ригатони
ja: リガトーニ

en: Tortiglioni
xx: Tortiglioni

en: Torti
xx: Torti
de: Spiralnudeln

en: Fusilli
xx: fusilli
af: Fusilli
ar: فوزيلي
bg: Фузили
cs: Fusilli
da: Fusilli
de: Fusilli, Spirelli
el: Φουζίλι
eo: Fuzilioj
es: Fusilli, Hélices
fa: فوسیلی
fi: Fusilli
fr: Fusilli, Torsades
he: פוזילי
hr: fusilli
id: Fusili
it: Fusilli
ja: フジッリ
jv: Fusilli
ko: 푸실리
mk: Фусили
ms: Fusilli
nl: Fusilli
no: Fusilli
pl: Fusilli
ru: Фузилли
sk: Fusilli
sr: Фузили
sv: Fusilli
th: ฟูซีลี
uk: Фузілі
zh: 紡錘粉

en: Linguine
xx: Linguine
bg: Лингуини
ja: リングイネ

en: Alphabet pasta
fr: Pâtes alphabet
hr: Abecedna tjestenina
ja: アルファベットパスタ
zh: 字母意大利面

it: Anelli
xx: Anelli

it: Anellini
xx: Anellini